District of Columbia statutes.
16-4406

Validity of agreement to arbitrate.

(a)

An agreement contained in a record to submit to arbitration any existing or subsequent controversy arising between the parties to the agreement is valid, enforceable, and irrevocable except upon a ground that exists at law or in equity for the revocation of a contract.

(b)

The court shall decide whether an agreement to arbitrate exists or a controversy is subject to an agreement to arbitrate.

(c)

An arbitrator shall decide whether a condition precedent to arbitrability has been fulfilled and whether a contract containing a valid agreement to arbitrate is enforceable.

(d)

If a party to a judicial proceeding challenges the existence of, or claims that a controversy is not subject to, an agreement to arbitrate, the arbitration proceeding may continue pending final resolution of the issue by the court, unless the court otherwise orders.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847
This section is referenced in § 16-4404.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).